Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB358.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 610.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "custodial interrogation" means any interview conducted
by a peace officer that would lead a reasonable child to believe that he or she is in
custody associated with an arrest and during which the peace officer takes
actions or ask questions that are reasonably likely to elicit a response from the
child that could incriminate him or her.
(2) When a peace officer has taken or received a child into custody on a charge of
committing an offense, prior to a custodial interrogation or interview and before
the waiver of the child's[the officer shall immediately inform the child of his]
constitutional rights[ and afford him the protections required thereunder], the peace
officer or a court-designated worker shall immediately arrange for the child to
consult with legal counsel in person or via telephone or video conference. The
consultation with legal counsel shall:
(a) Not be waived; and
(b) Be conducted in a location that allows for a private conversation.
(3) The peace officer shall notify the parent, or if the child is committed, the
Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as appropriate, and if the parent is not
available, then a relative, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child, that the child has been taken into custody, give an account
of specific charges against the child, including the specific statute alleged to have
been violated, and the reasons for taking the child into custody.
(4)[(2)] (a) When a peace officer has taken or received a child into protective
custody on suspicion of being a runaway, the officer shall immediately notify:
1. The child's parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child, if determined;
Page 1 of 6
BR240500.100 - 2405 - XXXX 3/2/2026 6:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2405
2. The cabinet or Department of Juvenile Justice, if appropriate; and
3. The court-designated worker.
(b) If the parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision is identified and notified, the peace officer may retain custody of
the child for a reasonable period to allow the person notified the opportunity
to arrive at the officer's location and collect the child.
(c) If the parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision cannot be identified or located, the peace officer may retain
custody of the child for a period of time not to exceed two (2) hours to
continue his or her investigation.
(d) If, at the conclusion of the peace officer's investigation, the parent, guardian,
or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child is identified
and notified, the peace officer shall return the child to the custody of that
person and shall file a status offense case with the court-designated worker.
(e) If, at the conclusion of the peace officer's investigation, the parent, guardian,
or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child cannot be
identified or located, or that person refuses to collect the child, the peace
officer shall file a complaint pursuant to KRS 610.012.
(5)[(3)] Unless the child is subject to trial as an adult or [unless ]the nature of the
offense or other circumstances [are such as to ]indicate the necessity of retaining
the child in custody, the officer shall release the child to the custody of:
(a) His or her parent;[ or]
(b) If the child is committed, the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as
appropriate; or
(c) 1. If the parent is not available or the child is not committed, then a
relative, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision
or other responsible person or agency approved by the court upon the
Page 2 of 6
BR240500.100 - 2405 - XXXX 3/2/2026 6:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2405
written promise, signed by such person or agency, to bring the child to
the court at a stated time or at a[such] time as the court may order.
2. The written promise, accompanied by a written report by the officer,
shall be submitted immediately[forthwith] to the court or court-
designated worker and shall detail the reasons for having taken custody
of the child, the release of the child, the person to whom the child was
released, and the reasons for the release.
(6)[(4)] (a) If the person fails to produce the child as agreed or upon notice from the
court as provided in subsection (5)[(3)] of this section, a summons, warrant,
or custody order may be issued for the apprehension of the person or of the
child, or both.
(b) If the person notified to collect a suspected runaway pursuant to subsection
(4)(a)[(2)(a)] of this section fails or refuses to collect the child, the peace
officer shall notify the county attorney, who may file a charge of endangering
the welfare of a minor, and the cabinet.
(7)[(5)] The release of a child pursuant to this section shall not preclude a peace
officer from proceeding with a complaint against a child or any other person.
(8)[(6)] Unless the child is subject to trial as an adult, if the child is not released, the
peace officer shall contact the court-designated worker who may:
(a) Release the child to his or her parents;
(b) Release the child to [such ]other persons or organizations as are authorized by
law;
(c) Release the child to either of the above subject to stated conditions; or
(d) Except as provided in subsection (9)[(7)] of this section, authorize the peace
officer to retain custody of the child for an additional period not to exceed
twelve (12) hours during which the peace officer may transport the child to a
secure juvenile detention facility or a nonsecure facility. If the child is
Page 3 of 6
BR240500.100 - 2405 - XXXX 3/2/2026 6:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2405
retained in custody, the court-designated worker shall give notice to the
child's parents or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the fact
that the child is being retained in custody.
(9)[(7)] (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, no child ten (10)
years of age or under shall be taken to or placed in a juvenile detention
facility.
(b) Any child ten (10) years of age or under who has been charged with the
commission of a capital offense or with an offense designated as a Class A or
Class B felony may be taken to or placed in a secure juvenile detention
facility or youth alternative center when there is no available less restrictive
alternative.
Section 2. KRS 610.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by statute, if an officer takes or receives a child into
custody on an allegation of committing a public offense or into protective custody
on being a suspected runaway, the child may be held at a police station, secure
juvenile detention facility, youth alternative center, a nonsecure facility, or, as
necessary, in a hospital or clinic for the following purposes:
(a) Identification and booking;
(b) Attempting to notify the parents or person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child, a relative, guardian, other responsible person, or the
cabinet;
(c) Photographing;
(d) Fingerprinting;
(e) Physical examinations, including examinations for evidence;
(f) Evidence collection, including scientific tests;
(g) Records checks;
(h) Determining whether the child is subject to trial as an adult; and
Page 4 of 6
BR240500.100 - 2405 - XXXX 3/2/2026 6:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2405
(i) Other inquiries of a preliminary nature.
(2) A child may be held in custody pursuant to this section for a period of time not to
exceed two (2) hours, unless an extension of time is granted. Permission for an
extension of time may be granted by the court, trial commissioner, or court-
designated worker pursuant to KRS 610.200(8)(d)[(6)(d)] and the child may be
retained in custody for up to an additional ten (10) hours at a facility of the type
listed in subsection (1) of this section except for an intermittent holding facility for
the period of retention.
(3) Any child held in custody pursuant to this section shall be sight and sound separated
from any adult prisoners held in secure custody at the same location, and shall not
be handcuffed to or otherwise securely attached to any stationary object.
Section 3. KRS 630.040 is amended to read as follows:
Any person taking a child into custody, with all reasonable speed, shall in this sequence:
(1) Deliver the child suffering from a physical condition or illness which requires
prompt medical treatment to a medical facility or physician. Children suspected of
having a mental or emotional illness shall be evaluated in accordance with the
provisions of KRS Chapter 645;
(2) Contact a court designated worker who shall have the responsibility for determining
appropriate placement pursuant to KRS 610.200(8)[(5)];
(3) If the court designated worker determines that the placements designated in KRS
610.200(8)[(5)] and subsection (1) of this section have been exhausted or are not
appropriate, a child may be delivered to a secure juvenile detention facility, a
juvenile holding facility, or a nonsecure setting approved by the Department of
Juvenile Justice pending the detention hearing;
(4) When the child has not been released to his or her parents or person exercising
custodial control or supervision, the person taking the child into custody shall make
a reasonable effort promptly to give oral notice to the parent or person exercising
Page 5 of 6
BR240500.100 - 2405 - XXXX 3/2/2026 6:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2405
custodial control or supervision of the child;
(5) In all instances the peace officer taking a child into custody shall provide a written
statement to the court designated worker of the reasons for taking the child into
custody;
(6) If the child is placed in an emergency shelter or medical facility, during the
adjudication and disposition of his case, the court may order his or her parents to be
responsible for the expense of his care; and
(7) The peace officer taking the child into custody shall within three (3) hours of taking
a child into custody file a complaint with the court, stating the basis for taking the
child into custody and the reason why the child was not released to the parent or
other adult exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, relative or other
responsible adult, a court designated agency, an emergency shelter or medical
facility. Pending further disposition of the case, the court or the court designated
worker may release the child to the custody of any responsible adult who can
provide adequate care and supervision.
Page 6 of 6
BR240500.100 - 2405 - XXXX 3/2/2026 6:15 PM Jacketed